Washington statutes.
RCW 9.05.060

Criminal sabotage defined—Penalty.

(1) Whoever, with intent that his or her act shall, or with reason to believe that it may, injure, interfere with, interrupt, supplant, nullify, impair, or obstruct the owner's or operator's management, operation, or control of any agricultural, stockraising, lumbering, mining, quarrying, fishing, manufacturing, transportation, mercantile, or building enterprise, or any other public or private business or commercial enterprise, wherein any person is employed for wage, shall willfully damage or destroy, or attempt or threaten to damage or destroy, any property whatsoever, or shall unlawfully take or retain, or attempt or threaten unlawfully to take or retain, possession or control of any property, instrumentality, machine, mechanism, or appliance used in such business or enterprise, shall be guilty of criminal sabotage.

(2) Criminal sabotage is a class B felony punishable according to chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2003 c 53 s 7; 1999 c 191 s 2; 1919 c 173 s 1; RRS s 2563-3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Endangering life by breach of labor contract: RCW 49.44.080.

Excessive steam in boilers: RCW 70.54.080.

Malicious injury to railroad property: RCW 81.60.070.

Malicious mischief—Injury to property: Chapter 9A.48 RCW.

Sabotaging rolling stock: RCW 81.60.080.